Wyoming, session 2026, HB0167.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-13-321(b) is amended to read:

21-13-321. Special education; amount provided for
special education programs and services; reimbursement for
out-of-district placements; district reporting
requirements; billing for Medicaid authorized school based
services.
HB0167

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0503

(b) Except for expenditures for out-of-district
special education placements, including placement for
behavioral supports, the amount provided to a school
district for special education shall be equal to one
hundred percent (100%) of the amount actually expended by
the district during the previous school year for special
education programs and services, which shall include the
amount actually expended by the district during the
previous school year for reasonable administrative costs to
bill for authorized Medicaid services under subsection (h)
of this section. Amounts awarded provided under this
section shall be in addition to and shall not be considered
in determining the school foundation program amount under
the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S.
21-13-309. Except for expenditures for out-of-district
special education placements, the department of education
shall distribute the amount computed under this section to
each school district in the same proportion and schedule of
distributions under W.S. 21-13-313(c). Expenditures by a
district for out-of-district special education placements
shall be reimbursed in the year in which the costs are
incurred and shall be distributed to each school district
HB0167

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0503
on a quarterly basis in accordance with rules adopted by
the department of education.

Section 2.

(a) Beginning school year 2026-2027, the base salary
for teachers, as utilized in the education resource block
grant model, as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv), shall be
equal to sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000.00), as
administrated by the state superintendent pursuant to W.S.
21-2-202(e).

(b) There is appropriated from the public school
foundation program account to the department of
education-school finance three hundred forty-eight million
six hundred thousand dollars ($348,600,000.00) for purposes
of making payments to school districts in accordance with
W.S. 21-13-313(c). This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
HB0167

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0503
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the department of
education-school finance's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

(c) There is appropriated from the public school
foundation program account to the department of
education-school finance eight million nine hundred
thousand dollars ($8,900,000.00) for purposes of
reimbursing school districts for retirement costs outside
the education resource block grant model. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation be included in the
department of education-school finance's standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

HB0167

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0503
Section 3. This act is July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0167